Massachusetts, session 194th, H5096.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (e) of section 1 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2022, is hereby
amended by striking out the date “December 31, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the
following date:- January 2, 2029.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1